Hawaii statutes.
§667-24 Cure of default.
(a) If the default is cured as required by the notice of default and intention
to foreclose, or if the parties have reached an agreement to resolve the
nonjudicial foreclosure, the
foreclosing mortgagee shall rescind the notice of default and intention to
foreclose. Within fourteen days of the date of the cure or an agreement to
resolve the nonjudicial foreclosure, the foreclosing mortgagee shall so notify
any person who was served with the notice of default and intention to foreclose.
If the notice of default and intention to foreclose was recorded, a release of
the notice of default and intention to foreclose shall be recorded.

(b) If the default is not cured as required
by the notice of default and intention to foreclose, the parties have not
reached an agreement to resolve the nonjudicial foreclosure and no report of
noncompliance has been issued against the mortgagee under section 667-82, and
the mortgagor has not elected to convert the foreclosure to a judicial action,
the foreclosing mortgagee, without filing a court action and without going to
court, may foreclose the mortgage under power of sale to sell the mortgaged
property at a public sale. [L 1998, c 122, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 48, §23; am L 2012, c 182, §18]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next